New York, session 2025-2026, S3539.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 404-b of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 277 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 5 in the same manner as other number plates [upon payment of the regular]. 6 The registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this 7 [chapter] article and [an] the initial one time service charge of 8 fifteen dollars shall be waived for one set of plates for each such 9 applicant upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the appli- 10 cant has attended twenty-five percent or more of the emergency calls for 11 the previous year. 12 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 404-f of the vehicle and traffic law, as 13 amended by chapter 277 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 16 in the same manner as other number plates [upon payment of the regular]. 17 The registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this 18 [chapter] article and [an] the additional annual service charge of 19 fifteen dollars shall be waived for one set of plates for each such 20 applicant upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the appli- 21 cant has attended twenty-five percent or more of the emergency calls for 22 the previous year. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08017-01-5